Mississippi, session 2026, HB1679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-151-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-201.  The following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Base amount" or "student base amount" means the student base funding level that is established in the funding formula as the estimated cost of educating a student with no additional measured needs or special factors. (b)  "Career and technical education course" or "CTE course" means a credit-bearing course that has been approved and classified by the department as a career and technical education, or CTE, course. (c)  "Charter school" means a public school that is established and operating under the terms of a charter contract pursuant to Chapter 28, Title 37, Mississippi Code of 1972. (d) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (e)  "English Language Learner" or "ELL" means a student identified in accordance with federal law as entitled to English as a second language or bilingual services on the basis of the student's English language proficiency. (f)  "Final weighted enrollment" means the final product of applying weights to the net enrollment of a school district or charter school after accounting for the sparsity of a school district or charter school, as determined in Section 37-151-205. (g)  "Gifted student" means a student identified as eligible to participate in a gifted education program for the instruction of intellectually or academically gifted children, as defined and provided for in Sections 37-23-171 through 37-23-181. (h) "Local contribution" means the amount of local tax money that school districts or charter schools must contribute to the cost of the funding formula for their district or charter school in a given fiscal year, as determined under Section 37-151-211. (i)  "Local minimum tax effort" means the amount in taxes that the local levying authority for each school district must raise on behalf of the school districts and charter schools in its geographic boundaries, as determined under Section 37-151-211. (j)  "Low income student" means a student who has been identified by the department, through inclusion in the identified student percentage, as having been approved for free meals based on documentation of: (i)  Receipt of benefits from the following federally funded programs: 1. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP); 2.  Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF); 3.  Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations (FDPIR); or 4.  Medicaid, where applicable, as approved by United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) to conduct matching with Medicaid data to identify children eligible for free meals; or (ii)  The inclusion of students who are identified as homeless children, migrant children, runaway children or Head Start children, who are approved for free school meals without application and not subject to verification, which includes foster children certified for free meals through means other than an application for free and reduced price school meals. (k)  "Net enrollment" means the average of the total aggregate student enrollment of a school district or charter school on the last day of months two (2) and three (3) of the previous school year.  The total aggregate student enrollment for each day may be determined by calculating the total number of students enrolled plus or minus the total number of new student enrollments or withdrawals, respectively, with the resulting amount being considered the total aggregate student enrollment on a given day.  However, if a local school board or the governing board of a charter school adopts a class schedule that operates throughout the year for any or all schools in the district or the charter school, net enrollment must be computed by the State Department of Education so that the resulting net enrollment will not be higher or lower than if the local school board or the governing board had not adopted a year-round schedule. (l)  "Preliminary weighted enrollment" means the initial product of applying weights to the net enrollment of a school district or charter school, as determined in Section 37-151-205. (m) "School board" means a governmental board exercising management and control over a school district and the schools of that district pursuant to the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and state statutes. (n)  "School district" or "district" means a governmental entity that establishes and supervises one or more public schools within its geographical limits pursuant to state statutes. (o)  "Sparsely populated district or charter school" means a school district or charter school with a density of less than eight (8) students per square mile, as determined by dividing the net enrollment of a district or charter school by the square mileage within its geographic boundaries.  For the purpose of determining the sparsity of a charter school, the square mileage of a charter school is equivalent to the square mileage within the geographic boundaries of the school district in which the charter school is located. (p)  "Special education program" means a program that provides services for exceptional children, as defined and authorized by Chapter 23, Title 37, Mississippi Code of 1972. (q)  "State share" means the amount the state contributes to the funding formula for the annual operating funding of each school district or charter school. (r) "Superintendent" means the administrative head of a school district. (s)  "Total funding formula" means the formula used to determine annual operating funding for public schools, as prescribed in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215. (t)  "Weight" or "weighting" means a multiplier used to adjust the preliminary weighted enrollment and final weighted enrollment to support the additional costs of educating students in defined student populations or in a defined geographic context. SECTION 2.  Section 37-151-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-203.  (1)  In fiscal year 2025, the student base amount shall be Six Thousand Six Hundred Ninety-five Dollars and Thirty-four Cents ($6,695.34) per student.  In fiscal years 2026, 2027 and 2028, the inflationary adjustment described in this section shall be applied to derive the total funding formula.  In fiscal year 2029, and every fourth fiscal year thereafter, the State Board of Education, on or before August 1, with an adjusted estimate no later than January 2, shall submit to the Legislative Budget Office, the Chairmen of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations and Education Committees, respectively, the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House a new proposed student base amount calculation using the following formula: (a)  Instructional cost.  To determine the instructional cost, the department shall first calculate the state's student to teacher ratio.  Such ratio shall be determined by dividing the net enrollment for public schools and charter schools in the state by the total number of teachers in such schools, as determined by the department, in months two (2) and three (3) of the school year preceding the year funds are to be appropriated.  The student to teacher ratio shall be rounded up to the nearest whole number.  After determining the student to teacher ratio, the average teacher salary shall be divided by the student-teacher ratio, and the resulting amount shall be considered the instructional cost. The average teacher salary shall be calculated by the department and include district local supplements as provided in Section 37-151-87, but shall not include the highest five percent (5%) and lowest five percent (5%) of district local supplements. (b)  Administrative cost; which shall be twenty percent (20%) of the instructional cost. (c)  Ancillary personnel and expenses; which shall be thirty percent (30%) of the instructional cost. (d)  Operation and maintenance of plant.  For the plant and maintenance cost component, the State Department of Education shall select districts that have a ratio of plant and maintenance expenditures per one hundred thousand (100,000) square feet of building space and a ratio of maintenance workers per one hundred thousand (100,000) square feet of building space that are both between one (1) standard deviation above the mean and two (2) standard deviations below the mean of the statewide average.  The plant and maintenance cost component shall be calculated by dividing the latest available months one (1) through nine (9) average daily attendance of the selected districts into the plant and maintenance expenditures of these selected districts.  For the purpose of this calculation, the Department of Education shall use the following funds, functions and objects:  Fund 1120 Functions 2600-2699, Objects 100-699 and Objects 800-999; Fund 2711 Functions 2600-2699, Objects 100-699 and Objects 800-999; Fund 2430 Functions 2600-2699, Objects 100-699 and Objects 800-999.  Net enrollment means the percentage change from the prior year of each year of each school district's months two (2) and three (3) average of net enrollment for the three (3) immediately preceding school years of the year for which funds are being appropriated. (2)  For purposes of these calculations, the State Department of Education shall utilize financial data from the second preceding year of the year for which funds are being appropriated. (3)  For each of the fiscal years between the recalculation of the base student cost, the base student cost shall be increased by an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the base student cost for the previous fiscal year, multiplied by the twenty year average annual change in the rate of inflation rounded up to the nearest tenth of a percent for the State of Mississippi as determined by the State Economist, plus any adjustments for additional state requirements including, but not limited to, teacher pay raises and health insurance premium increases.  The calculation shall be performed annually by the Department of Education, and the resulting amount shall replace base student cost from the previous year. (4)  In years when the total revenue of the state does not increase, the Legislature may retain the base student cost from the previous year.  If the total revenue increases the following year, the formula shall be recalculated or increased according to inflation as provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215. (5)  Base student cost shall not be lower than the previous year; provided, however, the base student cost may be lowered when the State Fiscal Officer provides notice to the Legislative Budget Office of a revenue shortfall in accordance with Section 27-104-13. (6)  By November 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the Legislative Budget Office, the Chairmen of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations and Education Committees, respectively, the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House, a report on the department's plan for implementation of the funding formula as specified under the provisions of Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, and to recommend any technical amendments necessary for its effective administration before the commencement of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature. (7)  The annual amount of funding for the operation of each school district and charter school under the total funding formula as provided under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 is determined by multiplying the student base amount, as determined under Section 37-151-203, by the final weighted enrollment of the school district or charter school, as determined under Section 37-151-205. SECTION 3.  Section 37-151-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-205.  (1)  The preliminary weighted enrollment of each school district and charter school under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 is determined by applying the weights prescribed in this section, none of which are mutually exclusive of another, to each applicable school district or charter school's net enrollment, as determined by Section 37-151-207.  To determine additional funding authorized under this section, the number of students in a school district that are identified as the applicable weight shall be calculated as a percentage of the students in the school district.  Such amount shall be referred to as the "percentage of applicable students." (2)  For students identified as low-income, as defined in Section 37-151-201, the percentage of applicable students in the school district is multiplied by thirty one-hundredths (30/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment. (3)  For students identified as English Language Learners, as defined in Section 37-151-201, the percentage of applicable students in the school district is multiplied by fifteen one-hundredths (15/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment. (4)  The following weights are applied to students who are identified as entitled to and receiving services in a special education program: (a)  Tier I:  For students diagnosed with a specific learning disability, speech and language impairment, or developmental delay, the percentage of applicable students in the school district is multiplied by sixty one-hundredths (60/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment. (b)  Tier II:  For students diagnosed with autism, hearing impairment, emotional disability, orthopedic impairment, intellectual disability, or other health impairment, the percentage of applicable students in the school district is multiplied by one hundred ten one-hundredths (110/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment. (c)  Tier III:  For students diagnosed with visual impairment, deaf-blindness, multiple disabilities, or traumatic brain injury, the percentage of applicable students in the school district is multiplied by one hundred thirty one-hundredths (130/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment. For the purpose of student counts, a student entitled to and receiving special education services may not be included under more than one (1) tier prescribed in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection.  A student having multiple diagnoses must be counted under the highest tier applicable to that student. (5)  A weight of five percent (5%) is applied to five percent (5%) of a school district or charter school's net enrollment for the purpose of providing gifted education, regardless of the number of students in a school district or charter school that have been identified as gifted students:  the total number of students in net enrollment in a school district or charter school, as determined by Section 37-151-207, is multiplied by five one-hundredths (5/100), which is again multiplied by five one-hundredths (5/100). (6)  For Ninth, Tenth, Eleventh and Twelfth Grade students enrolled in a career and technical education course, as defined in Section 37-151-201, the percentage of applicable students in the school district is multiplied by ten one-hundredths (10/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment.  Students enrolled in multiple career and technical education courses are counted once. (7)  In each school district or charter school where the number of students identified as low income, as defined in Section 37-151-201, exceeds thirty-five percent (35%) of the school district or charter school's net enrollment, a weight of ten percent (10%) is applied only to the number of low income students in excess of the number of low income students which constitute thirty-five percent (35%) of net enrollment. The number of students eligible for this weight is calculated by subtracting the number of students equivalent to thirty-five percent (35%) of the net enrollment of that school district or charter school from the total number of students in that school district or charter school identified as low income:  if the total percentage of applicable students identified in subsection (2) exceeds thirty-five percent (35%) of the school district or charter school's total net enrollment, as determined in Section 37-151-207, the difference between the total percentage of applicable students identified in subsection (2) and thirty-five percent (35%) of the school district or charter school's total net enrollment is multiplied by ten one-hundredths (10/100), and then multiplied by net enrollment. (8)  The final weighted enrollment of each school district and charter school under the total funding formula as provided for in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 is determined as follows: (a)  The final weighted enrollment for each school district or charter school that is not classified as a sparsely populated district or charter school, as defined in Section 37-151-201, is equivalent to the preliminary weighted enrollment of that school district or charter school, as determined in subsections (1) through (7) of this section: the State Department of Education shall add to the school district or charter school's net enrollment, as determined under Section 37-151-207, each of the additional figures calculated in accordance with subsections (2) through (7), and this total is the final weighted enrollment. (b)  The final weighted enrollment for each sparsely populated district or charter school, as defined in Section 37-151-201, is determined by multiplying the sparsity weight by the preliminary weighted enrollment, as determined in subsections (1) through (7) of this section, and then adding that figure to the preliminary weighted enrollment.  To calculate the final weighted enrollment, the State Department of Education shall add to the school district or charter school's net enrollment, each of the additional figures calculated in accordance with subsections (2) through (7) to determine the preliminary weighted enrollment, multiply this figure by the sparsity weight as determined below, and add this resulting number to the preliminary weighted enrollment to find the final weighted enrollment.  To calculate the sparsity weight, the State Department of Education shall find the difference between the number of students per square mile in that district or charter school and a sparsity threshold of eight (8) students per square mile, and then shall divide the resulting figure by one hundred (100) to create a percentage:  for example, if the number of students per square mile in a district is three (3), the difference is five (5) (eight (8) minus three (3)), and the sparsity weight is five percent (5%), or five one-hundredths (5/100). SECTION 4.  Section 37-151-207, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-207.  (1)  The net enrollment of a school district or charter school for use in the funding formula must be computed and currently maintained by the State Board of Education in accordance with the following: (a)  Determination of school district net enrollment for use in the funding formula.  Effective with fiscal year 2026, the State Department of Education shall determine the percentage change from the prior year of each school district's months two (2) and three (3) for the three (3) immediately preceding school years of the year for which funds are being appropriated. (b)  Determination of charter school net enrollment for use in the funding formula.  Effective with fiscal year 2026, the department shall base a charter school's net enrollment on the enrollment projections for the relevant year set forth over the term of the charter contract. (c)  The net enrollment of a school district used for funding formula calculations, as determined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, must be reconciled with the school district's net enrollment using months two (2) and three (3) for the year for which total funding formula funds are being appropriated, and any necessary adjustments must be made to payments during the school district's following year of operation.  Any necessary adjustment for a school district must be based on the state share of the per pupil amount in effect for the year for which actual net enrollment did not meet expectations and not any new amount appropriated for the year in which the adjustment will be made.  Reconciliation of net enrollment for charter schools must be based on requirements set forth in Section 37-28-55. (2)  The net enrollment of a school district or charter school must include any student enrolled in a dual enrollment-dual credit program as defined and provided for in Section 37-15-38. The State Department of Education shall make payments for dual enrollment-dual credit programs to the home school district or charter school in which the student is enrolled, in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education.  All state funding under the formula must cease upon completion of high school graduation requirements. (3)  The State Board of Education shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the counting and reporting of student enrollment by school districts and charter schools to the department in a manner that enables the provisions of Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 to be carried out.  The rules and regulations must require school districts and charter schools to submit data that includes, at a minimum, numbers for the specific student populations that are subject to weighting under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 as well as the aggregate amount of students in enrollment when each calculation is made. For the first year of operation of a charter school, the State Board of Education shall use imputed student demographic data based on the traditional district in which the charter school is located to estimate student populations that are subject to weighting under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215. (4)  The superintendent of each school district and the head of school of each charter school, as applicable, shall submit the data required by subsection (3) of this section with a signed affidavit attesting that the data submitted to the department is accurate to the best of the superintendent's knowledge, and any inaccuracies later discovered will be reported to the department.  The State Board of Education shall be specifically authorized and empowered to withhold allocations from the total funding formula funds as provided in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, to any school district or charter school for improperly or inaccurately reporting the student data required by Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215. SECTION 5.  Section 37-151-209, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-209.  Allocations to school districts or charter schools made by the State Department of Education on the basis of the count of students in student categories established for the purpose of applying various weights under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 are intended only to generate total appropriation amounts for school funding. Except as otherwise required by applicable state or federal law or by applicable rules, regulations, policies, or order of the State Board of Education and the State Department of Education, a school district or charter school may exercise full autonomy in the spending of all funds allocated under the formula to the district or charter school so long as funds are expended in the manner determined by the school board or governing board to best meet the needs of the student population of the school district or charter school. SECTION 6.  Section 37-151-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-211.  (1)  (a) Before February 1 of each year, the tax assessor of each county shall file reports with the State Department of Education which provide information essential to the department in determining the local contribution that each school district or charter school is required to provide toward the cost of local school funding.  A separate report must be filed for each school district or part of a school district situated in the county and must include the following information: (i)  The total assessed valuation of nonexempt property for school purposes in each school district; (ii)  Assessed value of exempt property owned by homeowners aged sixty-five (65) or older or disabled, as defined in Section 27-33-67(2); (iii)  The school district's tax loss from exemptions provided to applicants under the age of sixty-five (65) and not disabled, as defined in Section 27-33-67(1); and (iv)  The school district's homestead reimbursement revenues. (b)  The State Department of Education shall prepare and make available to the tax assessor of each county a form for the reports required under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1)(a). (2)  (a)  The department shall use the information submitted pursuant to subsection (1) to calculate and certify to each school district the millage required to raise its minimum local tax effort, which must be the value of not less than twenty-eight (28) mills for the then current fiscal year or a millage rate equivalent to twenty-seven percent (27%) of the total funding formula funds for the school district, any charter schools, and any Mississippi Achievement School District Schools located in its boundaries, whichever is a lesser amount as certified to the school district by the department, upon all of the taxable property of the school district, including the following sources: (i)   One hundred percent (100%) of Grand Gulf income, as prescribed in Section 27-35-309; and (ii)  One hundred percent (100%) of any fees in lieu of taxes, as prescribed in Section 27-31-104, in accordance with Section 37-57-1. (b)  The department shall determine the local contribution of each school district or charter school based on the minimum local tax effort, as determined under paragraph (a), and shall certify this required local contribution to each school district or charter school, as follows: (i)  For school districts in which there are no charter schools, the minimum local tax effort is the required local contribution for the school district. (ii)  For school districts in which there is located one or more charter schools, the local contribution of the school district is the product of multiplying the local pro rata amount by the net enrollment of the school district.  The department will calculate the local pro rata amount by dividing the school district's minimum local tax effort by the sum of the net enrollment of the school district, as determined by Section 37-151-207, and the projected enrollment of charter school students, as specified in Section 37-151-207, who reside or are estimated to reside in the district, but excluding from this projected enrollment any resident students who are projected to transfer from the district to a charter school after the calculation of the district's net enrollment, so as not to double-count those students. (iii)  For each charter school, the local contribution is the sum of the local pro rata amount for each charter school student, as determined by Section 37-151-207, based on each student's district of residence.  The department will calculate a local pro rata amount for each school district in which a student projected to attend the charter school resides or is estimated to reside using the methodology in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (b). (iv)  In the case of an agricultural high school, the local contribution is based on an equitable amount per pupil, as determined by the State Board of Education.  The State Board of Education shall set the millage requirement to generate such an amount and will certify this amount and millage requirement to agricultural high schools in the same manner as for all other school districts under this subsection. (3)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 37-151-213(1), the required state share in support of each school district and charter school is determined by subtracting the required local contribution, which total amount may not exceed twenty-seven percent (27%) of the total projected funding formula cost, from the total projected funding formula cost, as determined under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, for the school district or charter school. (4)  If the school board of any school district or charter school governing board determines that it is not economically feasible or practicable to operate any school within the district or charter school for the full one hundred eighty (180) days required for the school term of a scholastic year under Section 37-13-63, due to an enemy attack, man-made, technological, or natural disaster in which the Governor has declared a disaster emergency under the laws of this state or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster to exist in this state, the school board or charter school governing board may notify the State Department of Education of the disaster and submit a plan for altering the school term.  If the State Board of Education finds the disaster to be the cause of the school not operating for the contemplated school term and that the school is located in a school district covered by the Governor's or President's disaster declaration, the board may permit the schools located in that district to be operated for less than one hundred eighty (180) days and, in such case, the State Department of Education may not reduce the state share in support of the funding formula for that district or charter school because of the failure to operate those schools for one hundred eighty (180) days. SECTION 7.  Section 37-151-213, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-213.  (1)  To qualify for state funds under this chapter, a school district may not exceed a student-teacher ratio determined in accordance with appropriate accreditation standards developed by the Mississippi Commission on School Accreditation.  However, a local district may apply to the State Board of Education for approval of a waiver to this section by submitting and justifying an alternative educational program to serve the needs of enrollment.  The State Board of Education must approve or disapprove of the waiver no later than forty-five (45) days after the receipt of the application. (2)  If a school district violates a required student-teacher ratio, the state share in support of the funding formula for the next succeeding fiscal year to that school district must be reduced by the percentage variance that the actual student-teacher ratios in the school district is to the required student-teacher ratios established under accreditation standards. (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the State Board of Education may waive the student-teacher requirements upon a finding that a good faith effort is being made by a school district to comply with the ratio provision but, due to a lack of classroom space which is beyond the district's control, it is physically impossible for the district to comply, and the cost of temporary classroom space cannot be justified. (4)  If a school district meets the highest levels of performance classification, as determined by the State Board of Education in the state's accountability standards, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may exempt the school district from the maximum student-teacher ratio required under this section. (5)  This section is not applicable to charter schools. SECTION 8.  Section 37-151-215, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-151-215.  (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 37-151-211(3), the state share in support of the funding formula for a school district or charter school for fiscal year 2025, fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 may not be less than an amount equal to  the sum of all state funds received by that school district or charter school for fiscal year 2024, as follows: (a)  Funds distributed under the Mississippi Adequate Education Program; (b)  Funds distributed by the State Department of Education for the purpose of paying teachers' salaries according to the teacher salary schedule prescribed in Section 37-19-7 and assistant teachers, as prescribed in Section 37-21-7 for the 2023-2024 school year; and (c)  Funds distributed by and based on net enrollment or the total number of students enrolled for each day in each public school district or charter school, divided by the total number of school days, and allowable to be spent on any expenditures necessary to operate a public school district or charter school, excluding salary increases for superintendents, assistant superintendents or principals. (2)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2027. SECTION 9.  Section 37-57-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-57-1.  (1)  (a)  The boards of supervisors of the counties shall levy and collect all taxes for and on behalf of all school districts which were within the county school system or designated as special municipal separate school districts prior to July 1, 1986.  Such taxes shall be collected by the county tax collector at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes are collected by him, and the same penalties for delinquency shall be applicable. The governing authorities of the municipalities shall levy and collect all taxes for and on behalf of all school districts which were designated as municipal separate school districts prior to July 1, 1986.  Such taxes shall be collected by the municipal tax collector at the same time and in the same manner as municipal taxes are collected by him, and the same penalties for delinquency shall be applicable. Except as otherwise provided in Section 19-9-171, the county or municipal tax collector, as the case may be, shall pay such tax collections, except for taxes collected for the payment of the principal of and interest on school bonds or notes and except for taxes collected to defray collection costs, into the school depository and report to the school board of the appropriate school district at the same time and in the same manner as the tax collector makes his payments and reports of other taxes collected by him. However, the State Board of Education shall determine the appropriate levying authority for any school district created or reorganized after July 1, 1987. (b)  For the purposes of this chapter and any other laws pertaining to taxes levied or bonds or notes issued for and on behalf of school districts, the term "levying authority" means the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authorities of the municipality, whichever levies taxes for and on behalf of the particular school district as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. (2)  The levying authority for the school district shall, at the same time and in the same manner as other taxes are levied by the levying authority, levy a tax of not less than twenty-eight (28) mills for the then current fiscal year or a millage rate equivalent to twenty-seven percent (27%) of the total funding formula under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, whichever is a lesser amount, as certified to the school district by the State Department of Education, upon all of the taxable property of the school district.  However, in no case shall the minimum local ad valorem tax effort for any school district be equal to an amount that would require a millage rate exceeding fifty-five (55) mills in that school district.  However, if a levying authority is levying in excess of fifty-five (55) mills on July 1, 1997, the levying authority may levy an additional amount not exceeding three (3) mills in the aggregate for the period beginning July 1, 1997, and ending June 30, 2003, subject to the limitation on increased receipts from ad valorem taxes prescribed in Sections 37-57-105 and 37-57-107.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any school district that is levying more than fifty-five (55) mills pursuant to Sections 37-57-1 and 37-57-105 to decrease its millage rate to fifty-five (55) mills or less.  In making such levy, the levying authority shall levy an additional amount sufficient to cover anticipated delinquencies and costs of collection so that the net amount of money to be produced by such levy shall be equal to the amount which the school district is required to contribute as its minimum local ad valorem tax effort. The tax so levied shall be collected by the tax collector at the same time and in the same manner as other ad valorem taxes are collected by him.  The amount of taxes so collected as a result of such levy shall be paid into the district maintenance fund of the school district by the tax collector at the same time and in the same manner as reports and payments of other ad valorem taxes are made by the tax collector, except that the amount collected to defray costs of collection may be paid into the county general fund.  The levying authority shall have the power and authority to direct and cause warrants to be issued against such fund for the purpose of refunding any amount of taxes erroneously or illegally paid into such fund where such refund has been approved in the manner provided by law. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.